Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
CHAPTER 8 Probation

Law reviews.

For article, “A Review of Georgia’s Probation Laws,” see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 255 (1970).

For article, “Constructing Recidivism Risk,” see 67 Emory L.J. 59 (2017).

For note, “Give It to Me, I’m Worth It:
The Need to Amend Georgia’s Record Restriction Statute to Provide Ex-Offenders with a Second Chance in the Employment Sector,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 267 (2017).